NodeJsProjects/SpellChecker/Dictionaries/sk_SK/sk_SK.dic
bdieť/XN
biediť/XN
blížiť/XN
brániť/XN
bruchatieť/XN
búrať/XN
celieť/XN
clivieť/XN
čalúniť/XN
čiarkať/XN
čnieť/XN
debatúvať/XN
dláždiť/XN
dobývať/XN
dodávať/XN
dogniaviť/XN
dohovárať/XN
dokončievať/XN
dokúriť/XN
domáhať/XN
donútiť/XN
dopierať/XN
dopracúvať/XN
doriadiť/XN
dosládzať/XN
dostúpiť/XN
dotierať/XN
dotrieskať/XN
doumývať/XN
dovolávať/XN
doznievať/XN
dráždiť/XN
drsnieť/XN
dúpnieť/XN
dýchať/XN
flieskať/XN
glejovatieť/XN
hádať/XN
hladkávať/XN
hmýriť/XN
hovieť/XN
hrdzavieť/XN
hučať/XN
hýbavať/XN
chlpatieť/XN
chrániť/XN
chúlostivieť/XN
chýliť/XN
jemnieť/XN
kašovatieť/XN
klepávať/XN
klopkávať/XN
kôrnatieť/XN
krájať/XN
kreslievať/XN
kropievať/XN
kučeravieť/XN
kvíliť/XN
ľahostajnieť/XN
liať/XN
líhať/XN
lôchať/XN
lúštievať/XN
maľúvať/XN
menúvať/XN
miešať/XN
modlievať/XN
múdrieť/XN
nabehúvať/XN
nacigániť/XN
načmárať/XN
naddĺžiť/XN
nadieť/XN
nadpracovávať/XN
nadržiavať/XN
nafúkať/XN
nahlodávať/XN
nahrievať/XN
nachýliť/XN
nakrúcať/XN
naletúvať/XN
namaciavať/XN
namontovávať/XN
naobliekať/XN
napárať/XN
napočítať/XN
napúchať/XN
nariasiť/XN
narúšať/XN
nastielať/XN
nastrieľať/XN
nasúvať/XN
našuškávať/XN
natŕčať/XN
naváľať/XN
navíjať/XN
navŕtať/XN
nazdávať/XN
nažívať/XN
núrať/XN
obdierať/XN
obháňať/XN
obchvátiť/XN
obkiadzať/XN
oblapkávať/XN
oblietať/XN
obohrávať/XN
obrániť/XN
obschýnať/XN
obstúpiť/XN
obťažkávať/XN
obúvať/XN
octovatieť/XN
očesávať/XN
odbúravať/XN
odfajkúvať/XN
odhodlávať/XN
odchýliť/XN
odkázať/XN
odkrúcať/XN
odletúvať/XN
odlúpať/XN
odmŕzať/XN
odopierať/XN
odovzdávať/XN
odpíjať/XN
odpočívať/XN
odprávať/XN
odpykávať/XN
odŕhať/XN
odsekávať/XN
odstrieť/XN
odškierať/XN
odtatáriť/XN
odúčať/XN
odvážať/XN
odvolávať/XN
odžínať/XN
ohlášať/XN
ohŕdať/XN
ohýbať/XN
ochromievať/XN
okopávať/XN
okríkať/XN
okúsiť/XN
omachnatieť/XN
omieľať/XN
omývať/XN
oňuchávať/XN
opantávať/XN
opíjať/XN
oplešivieť/XN
opotrebúvať/XN
opriadať/XN
oriadiť/XN
osídliť/XN
osláviť/XN
ostávať/XN
osviežiť/XN
oškrabkávať/XN
ošpatnieť/XN
oťažieť/XN
otmavieť/XN
oťukávať/XN
oviazať/XN
ozbíjať/XN
ožiariť/XN
páliť/XN
pestúvať/XN
pípať/XN
plávať/XN
plieskať/XN
pobelievať/XN
pobúriť/XN
podbiehať/XN
podchytávať/XN
podkúpiť/XN
podlievať/XN
podnášať/XN
podoprieť/XN
podplácať/XN
podriemkavať/XN
podsievať/XN
podtínať/XN
podvádzať/XN
pofúkať/XN
pohášať/XN
pohrávať/XN
pochádzať/XN
pokálať/XN
poknísať/XN
pokúsiť/XN
poliať/XN
pomátať/XN
pomkýnať/XN
pomrmlávať/XN
pomýšľať/XN
ponachádzať/XN
ponášať/XN
poobliekať/XN
popadávať/XN
popínať/XN
poponáhľať/XN
poprekrúcať/XN
poprešívať/XN
popŕchať/XN
poprieť/XN
popritláčať/XN
porážať/XN
porozlievať/XN
porozpínať/XN
poroztrácať/XN
porúcať/XN
posiať/XN
posmievať/XN
pospomínať/XN
postieľať/XN
postonkávať/XN
postriekať/XN
posúdiť/XN
pošeptávať/XN
pošliapavať/XN
poštuchávať/XN
potápať/XN
potkýnať/XN
potriasať/XN
poúčať/XN
poupchávať/XN
pouzavierať/XN
povláčiť/XN
povrieť/XN
povybiehať/XN
povyhýnať/XN
povymieňať/XN
povypíjať/XN
povyrezávať/XN
povytínať/XN
povyzrádzať/XN
pozahatávať/XN
pozalievať/XN
pozapĺňať/XN
pozatláčať/XN
pozbíjať/XN
pozhovárať/XN
poznášať/XN
pozošívať/XN
požehnávať/XN
prášiť/XN
prebdieť/XN
prebojúvať/XN
prebývať/XN
prečiarať/XN
predčítať/XN
predierať/XN
predostierať/XN
predsúvať/XN
preflákať/XN
prehľadávať/XN
prehnívať/XN
prehŕňať/XN
prechovávať/XN
preklepávať/XN
prekovávať/XN
prekutávať/XN
preliepať/XN
premáčať/XN
premenúvať/XN
premietať/XN
premývať/XN
preobúvať/XN
preosiať/XN
prepchávať/XN
prepláchať/XN
prepožičiavať/XN
prerezávať/XN
presádzať/XN
preskúmať/XN
presnívať/XN
prestrkávať/XN
presvietiť/XN
preštárať/XN
pretkávať/XN
pretriediť/XN
prevážať/XN
prevísať/XN
prevrtávať/XN
prezrievať/XN
prežúvať/XN
pribiehať/XN
pričítať/XN
priekupníčiť/XN
prihliadať/XN
prihýnať/XN
prikrádať/XN
prikúriť/XN
priliezať/XN
primiešať/XN
priodiať/XN
pripamätúvať/XN
pripočítať/XN
pripútavať/XN
prirovnávať/XN
prispievať/XN
prisýpať/XN
pritrieť/XN
privárať/XN
privolávať/XN
príživníčiť/XN
pútať/XN
rapavieť/XN
riasiť/XN
rôsolovatieť/XN
rozbrázdiť/XN
rozbúšiť/XN
rozdiskutúvať/XN
rozdupávať/XN
rozhajdákať/XN
rozhorúčiť/XN
rozchytávať/XN
rozkopávať/XN
rozkydávať/XN
rozlievať/XN
rozmáhať/XN
rozmiesiť/XN
rozmýšľať/XN
rozohriať/XN
rozosiať/XN
rozostrieť/XN
rozozvučiavať/XN
rozpamätúvať/XN
rozpočítavať/XN
rozprávať/XN
rozprskúvať/XN
rozputnávať/XN
rozrozprávať/XN
rozsievať/XN
rozstrieť/XN
rozšíriť/XN
roztekávať/XN
roztriasať/XN
rozumieť/XN
rozvešiavať/XN
rozvláčať/XN
rozvrtávať/XN
rozžíhať/XN
rybárčiť/XN
scvrkávať/XN
sedlávať/XN
schádzať/XN
schvátiť/XN
silnieť/XN
skášať/XN
skonkrétniť/XN
skrátiť/XN
skrývať/XN
skúvať/XN
slovíčkariť/XN
smradievať/XN
snúbiť/XN
spamätúvať/XN
spievavať/XN
splesnieť/XN
spočívať/XN
spomáhať/XN
spracováť/XN
sprevádzať/XN
sprísnieť/XN
spútať/XN
starieť/XN
stínať/XN
stmieť/XN
strániť/XN
strhávať/XN
strieť/XN
strúsiť/XN
stýrať/XN
súžiť/XN
sviniť/XN
šedivieť/XN
šípiť/XN
škúlievať/XN
šmýkať/XN
štiepavať/XN
šúchavať/XN
temnieť/XN
tkvieť/XN
trávievať/XN
trieskať/XN
trúbiť/XN
túlavať/XN
týčiť/XN
ubytovávať/XN
udiať/XN
úfať/XN
uhrádzať/XN
uchrániť/XN
ukrátiť/XN
ulievať/XN
umlčiavať/XN
unúvať/XN
upodozrievať/XN
uráčiť/XN
usmiať/XN
ustrážiť/XN
utiekať/XN
utláčať/XN
utrmácať/XN
uvítať/XN
uznávať/XN
váľať/XN
vdrieť/XN
vídavať/XN
vkvapkávať/XN
vmiešať/XN
volávať/XN
vpúšťať/XN
vŕkať/XN
vŕzať/XN
vstávať/XN
vtískať/XN
vybiehať/XN
vybúriť/XN
vyclievať/XN
vyčíňať/XN
vydáviť/XN
vydráždiť/XN
vyfúkať/XN
vyhĺbiť/XN
vyhriať/XN
vychládzať/XN
vykĺbiť/XN
vykropiť/XN
vykúriť/XN
vyleptávať/XN
vymáhať/XN
vymrieť/XN
vyobliekať/XN
vypierať/XN
vyplývať/XN
vyprchávať/XN
vyriešiť/XN
vyschýnať/XN
vysnívať/XN
vystrúhať/XN
vyšpárať/XN
vytrepávať/XN
vytýčiť/XN
vyvolávať/XN
vyzrieť/XN
vyžúvať/XN
vznietiť/XN
zabiehať/XN
zacelievať/XN
zadláviť/XN
zaháľať/XN
zahrabúvať/XN
zahútať/XN
zajachtávať/XN
zakosíliť/XN
zakúriť/XN
zaliezať/XN
zamiesiť/XN
zanášať/XN
zaondieť/XN
zaplátať/XN
zapratávať/XN
zarážať/XN
zasievať/XN
zaspomínať/XN
zasúvať/XN
zatláčať/XN
zatýkať/XN
zavíjať/XN
zazelenieť/XN
zbelieť/XN
zbystrieť/XN
zdržiavať/XN
zhľadávať/XN
zintenzívnieť/XN
zlajdáčiť/XN
zlúpiť/XN
zmeriavať/XN
zmravnieť/XN
znecitlivieť/XN
zobliekať/XN
zondieť/XN
zostrúhať/XN
zošúľať/XN
zozbierať/XN
zrieť/XN
zúriť/XN
zvetrávať/XN
zvodnatieť/XN
žehnávať/XN
